Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1613.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 420.18 of Title 52, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The Liquefied Petroleum Gas Administration shall have the right
to conduct thorough investigations of liquefied petroleum gas
accidents or fires in this state. In case of an accident or fire at
any location where there is a liquefied petroleum gas system or
equipment, or in the case of any accident or fire where a liquefied
petroleum gas system or equipment is or may be involved, the State
Fire Marshal, the sheriff of the county, and the chief of the fire
department, or the mayor if no fire department exists, shall notify
the Liquefied Petroleum Gas Administration of such accident or fire
immediately at the time they become aware of same. In no event
shall this notification be forwarded later than one (1) business day
after knowledge of the accident or fire is obtained, in order to
enable an investigation to be made by the Liquefied Petroleum Gas
Administration before the site has been disturbed.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 52 O.S. 2021, Section 420.2, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 420.2. A. There is hereby created a State Liquefied
Petroleum Gas Administrator, to be appointed by the Governor from a
list of nominees submitted by the Oklahoma Liquefied Petroleum Gas
Board, hereinafter created. The appointment shall be subject to
confirmation by the Senate. The Administrator shall:
ENR. S. B. NO. 1613 Page 2

1. Receive a salary to be established by the Oklahoma Liquefied
Petroleum Gas Board;
2. Act in no other official or quasi-official capacity except
as herein provided; and
3. Serve at the pleasure of the Governor.
B. The Administrator, subject to approval of the Board, shall
appoint and fix the duties and compensation of employees necessary
to perform the duties imposed upon the Oklahoma Liquefied Petroleum
Gas Board by law.
C. 1. Persons appointed to the positions of Administrator,
chief deputy administrator, deputy administrator, or safety code
enforcement officer shall:
a. be citizens of the United States,
b. be legal residents of this state,
c. be physically, mentally, and morally capable of
performing the duties imposed upon them pursuant to
the Oklahoma Liquefied Petroleum Gas Regulation Act,
d. not have been convicted of a felony in this state or
any other state as established by a national criminal
history record check as defined in Section 150.9 of
Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes, and
e. after the date of their appointment, not be engaged in
any business in this state related to the production,
manufacture, distribution, sale, installation, or
transportation of any of the products or equipment
covered by the Oklahoma Liquefied Petroleum Gas
Regulation Act.
2. Each appointee shall, by education, training and experience,
be qualified and competent to perform the duties imposed upon them
pursuant to the Oklahoma Liquefied Petroleum Gas Regulation Act,
which for:
ENR. S. B. NO. 1613 Page 3

a. the Administrator shall include at least two (2)
years’ experience in positions of managerial
responsibility or two (2) years’ experience as a
liquefied petroleum gas safety code enforcement
officer,
b. the chief deputy administrator and deputy
administrators administrator shall include at least
one and one-half (1 1/2) years of such experience, and
c. the safety code enforcement officers shall include at
least two (2) years’ experience in actual physical
installation or inspection of liquefied petroleum gas
systems, containers, apparatus, or appliances, or
installations thereof, and/or the ability to enforce
the rules and regulations.
3. Before entering upon their duties, appointees shall take the
constitutional oath of office.
D. In the event of a vacancy in the office of Administrator, or
in the event of the absence or disability of the Administrator, the
chief deputy administrator is hereby empowered and authorized to
perform the duties of the Administrator during the time of such
vacancy, absence or disability.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 52 O.S. 2021, Section 420.3, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 420.3. A. There is hereby re-created the Oklahoma
Liquefied Petroleum Gas Board, hereinafter sometimes referred to as
“LP-Gas Board” or “Board”. The Board shall be composed of seven (7)
members, one each from the southeastern, northeastern, northwestern
and southwestern quarters of the state, one from central Oklahoma,
and two from the state at large. Each appointment shall be made by
the Governor, from a list of three or more nominees who have
certified in writing their willingness to serve, to be submitted to
him or her by the persons, firms, or corporations required to be
registered pursuant to the provisions of Sections Section 420.1
through 420.15 et seq. of this title, or by their representatives,
and shall be subject to confirmation by the Senate.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1613 Page 4

B. No person shall be appointed as a member of the Board unless
at the time of his or her appointment he or she has been a legal
resident of the State of Oklahoma for at least five (5) years
preceding the date of his or her appointment and, except for the two
members at large, shall have actively engaged in the retail
distribution of liquefied petroleum gas in Oklahoma for a period of
one (1) year, or more. One of the members at large shall be engaged
in and representative of the container and appliance phases of the
LPG business in Oklahoma, and the other shall have a general
familiarity with the regulatory problems of the industry and the
consuming public. Provided, however, that the appointment of such
public member shall not be subject to the aforementioned list which
is required to be submitted to the Governor. Members shall be
eligible for reappointment for successive terms, and shall be
removable for cause by the Governor. A member shall automatically
be disqualified to hold such office in event he or she ceases to be
a legal resident of the State of Oklahoma or ceases to be actively
engaged in the LPG business in Oklahoma.
C. Re-creation shall not alter existing membership or terms of
office. Members shall serve until their successors in office are
duly appointed and qualified. Initial appointments of those members
of the Board from the designated geographical areas of the state
shall be for terms ranging from one (1) year to five (5) years, the
Governor to designate same, and the initial terms of office of the
members at large on the Board shall be for one (1) year and two (2)
years, respectively, as designated by the Governor. Thereafter, the
terms of all members shall be for four (4) years. In the event of
the death, resignation, disqualification or incapacity of one or
more members of the Board, a recess appointment for the unexpired
term of each such member may be made by the Governor as hereinabove
provided. Members of the Board shall be entitled to be reimbursed
for necessary travel expenses as provided in the State Travel
Reimbursement Act.
D. The Board shall organize by electing one of its members as
chairman chair and one member as vice-chairman vice-chair. The
Board shall hold regular meetings. The date, time, and place of any
regular meeting shall be as designated by vote of the majority of
the membership. Four members of the Board shall constitute a quorum
for all purposes. The chairman chair or vice-chairman vice-chair
ENR. S. B. NO. 1613 Page 5

may, upon approval of a majority of the members present and voting
at any meeting, designate the time, place, and date of any scheduled
a special meeting, and the chairman chair or vice-chairman vice-
chair shall have the power to call an unscheduled a special meeting
of the Board upon not less than five (5) days’ notice in writing to
each member thereof as provided in the Oklahoma Open Meeting Act
pursuant to Section 301 et seq. of Title 25 of the Oklahoma
Statutes.
E. The standards for the storage and handling of liquefied
petroleum gases adopted by the National Fire Protection Association
and published in Pamphlet No. 58 including current and subsequent
editions and any subsequent changes and/or or additions to the
pamphlet, and the standards for the installation of gas appliances
and gas piping adopted by the National Fire Protection Association
and published in Pamphlet No. 54 including the current and any
subsequent editions and any subsequent changes and/or or additions
to the pamphlet shall be the accepted standards for this state. The
Board is hereby empowered and authorized, and it shall be its duty
to prescribe, adopt, and promulgate, in the manner set forth in
Section 420.1 et seq. of this title, rules relating to safety in the
storage, distribution, dispensing, transporting, and utilization of
LPG in this state and in the manufacture, fabrication, assembly,
sale, installation, or use in this state of LPG systems, containers,
apparatus, or appliances, and reasonable rules governing the
issuance of such permits and operations thereunder, and not
inconsistent with the Oklahoma Liquefied Petroleum Gas Regulation
Act, as it shall deem just and reasonable, and to revoke, amend, or
supersede such supplementary rules.
F. The Administrator shall administer and enforce all rules
formulated and adopted by the Board and administer and enforce the
safety rules prescribed, adopted, or promulgated by the Board under
and by virtue of the provisions of the Oklahoma Liquefied Petroleum
Gas Regulation Act, and incur all necessary expenditures in
effectuating the purposes of this subsection. The Administrator
shall serve as secretary to the Board, and shall be subject to
confirmation by the Senate.
G. Before any rules are revised, amended, adopted or
promulgated hereunder, the Administrator, acting on behalf of the
Board, shall give ten (10) days’ notice to all Class I and Class II
ENR. S. B. NO. 1613 Page 6

permit holders under the Oklahoma Liquefied Petroleum Gas Regulation
Act, by mailing to the permit holders a written notice, signed by
the Administrator, on behalf of the Board, containing either a
statement of the terms or substance of the intended action, a
description of the subjects and issues involved, or an accurate copy
of the new, revised or amended rules which the Board proposes to
adopt and promulgate, stating the date, time, and place of a public
hearing at which oral or written objections to such proposals shall
be heard and considered. Notice shall also be given as required by
the Administrative Procedures Act. Nothing in this subsection shall
prevent the furnishing of such other or additional notice as the
Board shall direct.
H. At any hearing held under this section, not less than a
quorum of the Board shall be present and shall preside; provided,
however, that by unanimous vote and resolution, the Board may
authorize the Administrator to preside at any or all such hearings,
and in such event no Board member need be present. After any such
hearing the Board may, by majority vote, adopt any proposed new,
revised, or amended rules with such amendments and modifications
thereof as the the Board shall deem just and reasonable, and a
certificate reciting such adoption and the effective date thereof
shall be signed by the members comprising the majority of the Board.
SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 52 O.S. 2021, Section 420.4, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 330, O.S.L. 2022 (52 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 420.4), is amended to read as follows:
Section 420.4. A. No person, firm, or corporation shall
manufacture, fabricate, assemble, or install in this state any
system, container, apparatus, or appliance used or to be used in
this state in or for the transportation, storage, dispensing, or
utilization of LPG, nor shall any transporter, distributor, or
retailer of LPG store, dispense, or transport over the highways of
this state any LPG intended for use in this state in any such
system, container, apparatus, or appliance, without having first
applied for and obtained a registration permit to do so. A permit
shall not be required by any person, firm, or corporation engaged in
the production or manufacture of LPG, or selling or reselling LPG to
transporters, gas processors, distributors, or retailers, nor by any
person, firm, or corporation selling or delivering motor vehicles or
tractors which are factory equipped with an LPG system, container,
ENR. S. B. NO. 1613 Page 7

apparatus, or appliance for the utilization of LPG as motor fuel.
The provisions of this section shall not prevent an individual from
installing in his or her own single-unit residence any system,
container, apparatus, or appliance which uses or will utilize LPG,
provided that such individual has secured an inspection of the
installation by the Administrator or someone designated by the
Administrator or by a person duly licensed to make such an
installation prior to the use of the system, container, apparatus,
or appliance. Applications for registration permits shall be in
writing, on a form provided by the Board, and shall contain such
pertinent information as is required by the Board. Upon approval of
each application and receipt of the certificates of insurance or
securities required by the provisions of this section, the
Administrator shall issue to the applicant a permit to engage in the
phase of the LPG industry in this state to which such permit
applies. No permit other than the Class I Dealer Permit shall be
transferable. The Board is authorized to establish a fee for the
transfer of a Class I Permit. Nothing in Sections Section 420.1
through 420.15 et seq. of this title shall be construed to regulate
the manufacturing, fabrication, assembling, selling, or installing
of any system, container, apparatus, or appliance having a fuel
container with a maximum individual water capacity of less than two
and one-half (2 1/2) pounds.
B. 1. The Board is authorized to establish an annual permit
fee for the issuance of each class of permit listed in subsection C
of this section.
2. All such registration permits shall expire annually with no
permit extending longer than one (1) calendar year. The expiration
dates shall be set by the Board in the rules. The Administrator may
issue a semiannual permit to applicants engaging in the business
within six (6) months or less of the annual renewal date. A
semiannual permit shall expire on the following annual expiration
date. The fee for a semiannual permit shall be one-half (1/2) that
of the fee of the annual permit. All registration permits required
pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be renewed upon
payment of the annual fees on or before the expiration of the
registration permit, and upon fulfilling all insurance requirements.
The Board is authorized to establish necessary penalty provisions
required to ensure prompt payment of the annual fees.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1613 Page 8

3. The Board is authorized to establish specifications which
set forth the scope of authority for each class of permits.
4. The Board is authorized to establish an initial permit fee
for the issuance of Class I and Class II permits to any person, firm
or corporation for the first time.
C. Persons, firms, and corporations required to be registered
pursuant to the provisions of Sections Section 420.1 through 420.15
et seq. of this title, at the time of issuance of each permit, shall
pay to the Administrator the initial permit fee, if applicable, and
any annual fee that is applicable to the following permit classes:
1. Class I - Dealer Permit;
2. Class II - Truck Transporter Permit;
3. Class III - DOT Cylinder Transporter Permit;
4. Class IV - Installer Permit;
5. Class IV-D - Driver/Installer Permit;
6. Class V – Food Truck Permit;
7. Class VI - DOT Cylinder and/or LPG Motor Fuel Station;
7. 8. Class VI-A - LPG Dispensing Permit;
8. 9. Class VII - Cylinder Exchange Program Permit;
9. 10. Class VIII – Unodorized LPG Permit;
10. 11. Class IX - LPG Container Sales Permit;
11. 12. Class IX-A - Manufactured Homes and Recreation Sales
Permit; and
12. 13. Class X - Manager’s Permit.
D. 1. Each person, firm, or corporation holding a permit
authorizing the use of an LPG bulk delivery truck or trailer shall
ENR. S. B. NO. 1613 Page 9

owe at the time of inspection an annual inspection fee in an amount
as established by the Board for each delivery truck or trailer
belonging to the person, firm, or corporation. Each person, firm or
corporation who does not hold a permit issued by the Board
authorizing the use of an LPG bulk delivery truck or trailer in the
state shall pay an annual inspection fee in an amount as established
by the Board for each such truck or trailer belonging to the person,
firm, or corporation being used to dispense or transport LPG in the
state.
2. The inspection fee shall increase to an amount established
by the Board per vehicle if the inspection is not completed within
sixty (60) days of the expiration date, or at a later date at the
discretion of the Administrator.
E. Any LPG bulk delivery truck or trailer failing to be
approved at its annual inspection shall be assessed a fee in an
amount as established by the Board at the time that it is
reinspected.
F. The fees provided for in this section shall be applicable to
residents and nonresidents of Oklahoma.
G. The Board is authorized to approve or disapprove
applications for registration permits to distributors and retailers
of LPG and managers of LPG establishments. The Administrator is
authorized to approve or disapprove all other applications for
registration permits that may be issued pursuant to the provisions
of this section.
1. No application shall be approved by the Administrator unless
the Administrator is satisfied that the applicant by written
examination has shown a working knowledge of the safety requirements
provided by the rules of the Board.
2. No application shall be approved by the Board unless the
Board is satisfied by adequate written examination of the applicant,
or the individual who is or shall be directly responsible for
actively supervising the operations of such applicant which is a
partnership, firm or corporation, that the applicant or such
individual has a working knowledge of the safety requirements
provided by the rules of the Board. The Board shall cause to be
ENR. S. B. NO. 1613 Page 10

held public hearings in the months of January, April, July and
October of each year on all applications for new registration
permits required by the provisions of this section, or upon such
other occasions as the Board may deem necessary. Notice of each
hearing shall be mailed to each such applicant and shall be posted
in a conspicuous place in the Office of the Administrator in
Oklahoma City, Oklahoma, at least thirty (30) days prior to the date
of the hearing. The notice shall include the name, address, permit
class and business location of each applicant whose application is
to be considered at the hearing. The applicant, or the individual
who is or shall be directly responsible for and actively supervising
the operations of the applicant, may be present at the hearing. If,
after the public hearing, an applicant is found by the Board to have
a working knowledge of the safety requirements provided by the rules
and regulations of the Board, the Board shall cause an order to that
effect to be entered upon its records and the application shall be
approved. In the event an applicant fails to qualify, the fact
shall be entered upon the Board’s records.
3. The Board shall charge a fee, in an amount established by
the Board, for testing materials and the expense of holding the
examinations provided for in this section. The fee shall be paid
upon filing an application for any permit.
H. A registration permit shall not be issued to any applicant
unless the Administrator has received certificates of insurance or
security as required by this section.
I. Except as otherwise provided for in this section, all
persons, firms or corporations engaged in the business of
manufacturing, fabricating, assembling, or installing any LPG
system, container, apparatus, or appliance in this state, and
required to be registered pursuant to the provisions of Sections
Section 420.1 through 420.15 et seq. of this title, shall file with
the Administrator a certificate indicating liability insurance
coverage for the manufacturer and contractor. The Board is
authorized to establish coverage amounts for each class of permit,
provided coverage shall be for an amount of not less than Twenty-
five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) to Fifty Thousand Dollars
($50,000.00) for bodily injury and limits of not less than Twenty-
five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) for property damage, and shall be
ENR. S. B. NO. 1613 Page 11

in full force and effect, covering the plant, equipment and motor
vehicles used in such business, and the operations of the business.
J. Except as otherwise provided for in this section, all
transporters, distributors, or retailers of LPG in this state,
required to be registered pursuant to Sections Section 420.1 through
420.15 et seq. of this title, shall file with the Administrator a
certificate indicating that public liability and property damage
insurance coverage has been issued. The Board is authorized to
establish coverage amounts for each class of permit, provided
coverage shall be for an amount of not less than Twenty-five
Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) to Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00)
for bodily injury and limits of not less than Twenty-five Thousand
Dollars ($25,000.00) for property damage has been issued, and is in
full force and effect, covering the plant, equipment, and motor
vehicles used in such business, and the operations of the business.
K. Insurance pursuant to the provisions of this section shall
be maintained in full force and effect during the operation of the
business for which the coverage was issued. Except as otherwise
provided for in this section, or in administrative rules promulgated
by the Board, no registration permit shall be issued until the
certificate is filed with the Administrator. No insurance coverage
shall be canceled or terminated without thirty (30) days days’ prior
written notice of cancellation or termination to the Administrator.
L. The Board is authorized, upon proof of or a satisfactory
showing that any person, firm, or corporation is financially able to
pay or satisfy any judgment, claim, or demand against the person,
firm or corporation, to waive the insurance coverage required by
this section. The Board, in lieu of the certificate, may require
the deposit, with the Administrator, of securities, or satisfactory
indemnity bond, in an amount and of a kind designated by the Board,
to secure the liability of such person, firm, or corporation to pay
any judgment, claim, or demand. The security shall not be in excess
of the limits set forth in this section. If the Board deems the
financial status of such person, firm or corporation to be impaired
so as to reduce the ability of such person, firm or corporation to
make payment or to satisfy any judgment, claim, or demand, the Board
may revoke the waiver and require the person, firm, or corporation
to file certificates required by this section within thirty (30)
ENR. S. B. NO. 1613 Page 12

days after written notice is sent by the Board to the person, firm
or corporation.
SECTION 5. AMENDATORY 52 O.S. 2021, Section 420.5, as
amended by Section 2, Chapter 330, O.S.L. 2022 (52 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 420.5), is amended to read as follows:
Section 420.5. A. The Oklahoma Liquefied Petroleum Gas Board
is authorized to establish a fee, to be paid to the Administrator,
upon the sale, purchase, rental and/or, or use in this state of
liquefied petroleum gas refillable cylinders and all other liquefied
petroleum gas containers. The fee shall be used to offset the cost
of Liquefied Petroleum Gas Administration inspections, including,
but not limited to, inspections of whether cylinders were
constructed in accordance with United States Department of
Transportation specifications and inspections of cylinder exchange
stations.
B. Each manufacturer of LP-Gas LPG containers in Oklahoma this
state, each vendor of containers manufactured outside of the this
state, and each person, firm, or corporation placing any LPG
container or cylinder in use in this state, including, but not
limited to, LPG dealers or distributors who ship containers from any
point outside of this state to a point within this state, shall pay
the applicable fee. For vendors of containers manufactured outside
of this state, the fee or fees shall apply and become due upon
delivery to the vendors, or for their account within the state of
containers or cylinders purchased outside of the this state. In no
event shall the fees herein levied be paid or become payable on any
container or cylinder sold, rented, purchased, or placed in use in
this state prior to the effective date of this act, or more than
once on any container or cylinder, or upon any container or cylinder
resold, rerented, repurchased or reused in this state. The
Administrator is authorized to refund or credit fees upon containers
sold outside of the state upon which the fees have previously been
paid, or any fees which have erroneously been paid, upon written
application supported by affidavit setting forth the basis for such
refund. The Administrator is authorized to adopt a system of
identification of containers on which the fees herein levied have
been paid June 30, 1953. The Board shall promulgate administrative
rules establishing cylinder and container fees and to implement the
provisions of this section.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1613 Page 13

C. For containers that are placed in cylinder exchange cabinets
for sale or rental, the cylinder and container fee shall be a flat
fee that is levied on an annual basis for each separate Class VII
permit location. For the purposes of this act, a cylinder exchange
cabinet is a lockable and ventilated metal locker or rack for the
storage of LPG cylinders that prevents tampering with valves and
pilferage into the cylinders. The Administrator is authorized to
adopt a system that identifies the cylinders and containers on which
the fees levied herein have been paid. Such a system may include
identification tags that are affixed to individual cylinders and
tanks or cylinder exchange cabinets.
D. No person, firm, or corporation shall use or install in this
state any container or cylinder upon which the applicable fee levied
above applies and has not been paid. In case of failure to pay any
invoice issued by the Administration within the specified time,
there shall be assessed a penalty of twenty-five percent (25%),
which shall be added to the applicable fee thirty-five (35) calendar
days of the issuance thereof, there shall be assessed a penalty of
twenty-five percent (25%), which shall be added to the applicable
fee. The twenty-five-percent penalty shall be in addition to any
other penalty provided by law, including, but not limited to, the
administrative penalty established pursuant to Section 420.6 of this
title.
SECTION 6. AMENDATORY 52 O.S. 2021, Section 420.7, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 420.7. A. It shall be the duty of the Administrator to
inspect, or to provide for the inspection of, any LPG systems,
containers, apparatus, or appliances installed in this state, and
any LPG bulk-delivery trucks or trailers used in this state,
whenever in the discretion of the Administrator, any deputy
administrator, or any safety code enforcement officer such
inspection is necessary to effectuate the purposes of this act. The
Administrator and any, deputy or administrator, and any safety code
enforcement officer are hereby severally empowered and authorized to
enter upon any premises where any such installation is being or has
been made to conduct such inspection.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1613 Page 14

B. The Administrator, under the direction of the Oklahoma
Liquefied Petroleum Gas Board, shall require proving of metering
system to determine the accuracy to be within the manufacturer’s
tolerance not to exceed plus or minus one percent (1%) at any time.
The LPG liquid meter system shall be designed and constructed to
provide for applying lead-and-wire seals in such a manner that no
modifications or adjustments which would affect the accuracy of
deliveries, can be made without mutilating the seal or seals.
C. Every person to whom the Board or the Administrator issues a
registration permit as herein provided shall have immediate
possession of the permit at all times when engaged in that phase of
the LPG business for which the same was issued and shall display the
same upon demand of the Administrator, the chief deputy
administrator, or any deputy administrator, or any safety code
enforcement officer.
D. The Administrator and, the chief deputy administrator, and
such deputies and such safety code enforcement officers as the
Administrator shall by appropriate written commission appoint, shall
have all of the powers and authority of peace officers of this state
in making arrests for violations of this act or the safety rules
promulgated thereunder, or in serving any process, notice or order
connected with the enforcement of this act issued by the
Administrator. The Administrator, deputy administrator, and safety
code enforcement officers shall be certified by the Council on Law
Enforcement Education and Training (CLEET) before the Administrator
may appoint, by appropriate written commission, any safety code
enforcement officer to have all of the powers and authority of a
peace officer of this state in making arrests for violations of this
act or the safety rules promulgated thereunder, or in serving any
process, notice, or order connected with the enforcement of this act
issued by the Administrator.
E. The Administrator, the chief deputy administrator and any
deputy administrator or, and any safety code enforcement officer are
hereby empowered and authorized to sign complaints against and to
cause the arrest of any person charged with a violation or
violations of this act or the safety rules promulgated thereunder.
In the event the district attorney fails or refuses to draw or
endorse any complaint submitted to the district attorney and the
complainant, whether it be the Administrator, the chief deputy
ENR. S. B. NO. 1613 Page 15

administrator or any deputy administrator, or any safety code
enforcement officer, desires to secure prosecution of the complaint,
then and in that event any court of competent jurisdiction shall be
authorized to issue a warrant for the arrest of the person charged
in the complaint and the complainant shall not be required to file
with the court the bond provided to be filed with and approved by
the court in Sections 231 through 233 of Title 22 of the Oklahoma
Statutes.
F. The Administrator and any, deputy or administrator, and any
safety code enforcement officer are hereby severally empowered and
authorized to condemn any liquefied petroleum gas system, container,
apparatus or appliance in this state not manufactured, fabricated,
assembled or installed in accordance with the safety rules adopted
or promulgated under this act, and shall have the authority to
forbid the use of any such system, container, apparatus or appliance
unless and until the same have been made to comply in all respects
with such safety rules.
G. The Administrator is hereby empowered and authorized to
inspect or cause the inspection of the records of any person, firm
or corporation pertaining to the installation by such person, firm
or corporation of liquefied petroleum gas systems, containers,
apparatus or appliances in this state.
H. The Attorney General of the State of Oklahoma shall appear
and represent the Administrator and the Board and members thereof,
or any of them, in all litigation or other proceedings that may
arise in the discharge of duties and shall, at the request of the
Administrator, assist the district attorney in prosecuting charges
of violations of this act.
SECTION 7. AMENDATORY 52 O.S. 2021, Section 420.9, as
amended by Section 3, Chapter 330, O.S.L. 2022 (52 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 420.9), is amended to read as follows:
Section 420.9. A. All liquefied petroleum gases designated as
commercial propane, commercial butane or mixtures thereof, sold for
consumption in this state, shall, when subjected to the test methods
of the GPA Midstream Association, meet applicable specifications
adopted as tentative standards by the Association for the particular
product sold.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1613 Page 16

B. All vehicles used in hauling or transporting liquefied
petroleum gases upon the highways of this state shall be identified
in such manner as the Administrator may, by rule, prescribe.
C. The Department of Public Safety of the State of Oklahoma
shall cooperate with the Administrator in the enforcement of the
provisions of this section, and the rules promulgated thereunder.
D. Transport trucks transporting liquefied petroleum gases
intrastate which are owned or operated by a person subject to and
licensed by the Oklahoma Liquefied Petroleum Gas Regulation Act
shall not be required to obtain or possess an intrastate motor
carrier or private carrier license issued by the Oklahoma
Corporation Commission.
E. Containers shall be filled or used only upon authorization
of the fee simple owner. The name of the fee simple owner, if other
than the consumer, shall be conspicuously shown on the container Any
registered permit holder under the Oklahoma Liquefied Petroleum Gas
Regulation Act, pursuant to Section 420.4 of this title, shall
conspicuously mark any containers owned by such permit holder so
that the owner of any given container can be easily identified.
Containers owned by one permit holder shall only be filled or used
by another permit holder upon authorization of the permit holder
owning the container. In all instances, a consumer’s authorization
to fill a container shall be required before filling it.
F. At least one attendant shall remain close to the transfer
connection from the time the connections are first made until they
are finally disconnected, during the transfer of the product.
During the actual transfer of liquids into containers at domestic
type dwellings and installations, the attendant shall not enter into
any type of enclosure including, but not limited to, truck cabs,
dwellings, and barns and shall maintain visual contact with the
liquid level gauge at all times.
SECTION 8. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1613 Page 17

Passed the Senate the 16th day of February, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 5th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1613 Page 18